New Jersey, session 222, A4871.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer shall be allowed to deduct from gross income the amount of charitable contributions made during the taxable year to a nonprofit entity that is a recipient of State funds or an economic development subsidy in that year.  The deduction allowed pursuant to this section shall not exceed $10,000 for a married taxpayer filing a joint return or an individual filing as head of household, and $5,000 for a married individual filing a separate return, unmarried individuals other than individuals filing as head of household, or a surviving spouse. b.    As used in this section: ²Economic development subsidy² means a provision of financial assistance to a business entity by or from a State public body with a value of greater than $500 for the purpose of stimulating economic development in New Jersey, including, but not limited to, any bond, grants, loan, loan guarantee, matching fund, tax credit, or other type of tax incentive.  ²Economic development subsidy² shall not mean any contract under which a State public body purchases or otherwise procures goods, services, or construction on an unsubsidized basis, including any contract solely construction or renovation owned by a State public body. ²Nonprofit entity² means a corporation, association, or organization, which is not operated for pecuniary profit of any private shareholders or individual, and which is not a component of the federal, State, or local governments. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and apply to charitable contributions made in taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.